Georgia, session 2025_26, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
offenses against public order, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-11-46.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'First responder' means any person or agency who provides on-site care until the
arrival of a duly licensed ambulance service. This shall include, but not be limited to,
persons who routinely respond to calls for assistance through an affiliation with law
enforcement agencies, fire suppression agencies, rescue agencies, and others.
S. B. 268
- 1 -

LC 56 0346
(2) 'Harass' means to willfully engage in any conduct directed at a first responder which
intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder and serves no
legitimate purpose.
(b) A person commits the offense of interference with a first responder when he or she,
after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or
reasonably should know is a first responder, who is engaged in the lawful performance of
a legal duty, knowingly and willfully violates such warning and approaches or remains
within 25 feet of the first responder with the intent to:
(1) Impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to perform such duty;
(2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
(3) Harass the first responder.
(c) A person convicted pursuant to this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of
a high and aggravated nature."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 268
- 2 -